Wyoming, session 2025, HB0309.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 42-1-102(a)(intro) is amended to
read:

42-1-102. Conflict with federal laws.

(a) If any provision of this title or W.S. 14-2-1001
through 14-2-1008 is found to be in conflict with federal
HB0309

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0518
law or to come in conflict with federal law due to new
federal enactments, the department shall:

Section 2. W.S. 14-2-822(g), 14-2-1001 through
14-2-1008, 20-2-401(f) and (g) and 42-4-122 are repealed.

Section 3. Any proceeding or action brought under the
Medicaid Fairness Act before July 1, 2025 and any rights
acquired or obligations incurred under the Medicaid
Fairness Act before July 1, 2025 shall remain active and
valid after July 1, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0309